Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.15
Generic label, defined.

Generic label means a
label which is not protected by a registered trademark, either in whole or
in part, or to which no person has acquired a right pursuant to state or federal
statutory or common law.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 23.